dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
  <!-- स्ष्टतः; स्ष्टतः; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्ष्टतः__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किनारैकिनार; किनारैकिनार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किनारैकिनार__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्यत्रै; अन्यत्रै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्यत्रै__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झल्झली; झल्झली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झल्झली__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माथिल्लो; माथिल्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माथिल्लो__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जिरीङ्ग; जिरीङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जिरीङ्ग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जबकी; जबकी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जबकी__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छउञ्जेल; छउञ्जेल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छउञ्जेल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सर्रसर्र; सर्रसर्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सर्रसर्र__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अधिराज्यभर; अधिराज्यभर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अधिराज्यभर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तत्र; तत्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तत्र__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तत्र; तत्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तत्र__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रञ्जनाभन्दा; रञ्जनाभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रञ्जनाभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बताउनुभन्दा; बताउनुभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बताउनुभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठीक्क; ठीक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठीक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साँच्ची; साँच्ची; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साँच्ची__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- केहिबेर; केहिबेर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="केहिबेर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फाट्टफुट्ट; फाट्टफुट्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फाट्टफुट्ट__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मगमग; मगमग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मगमग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नहुन्जेल; नहुन्जेल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नहुन्जेल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शान्तिपूर्वक; शान्तिपूर्वक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शान्तिपूर्वक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रदूषणभन्दा; प्रदूषणभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रदूषणभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वभावअनुसार; स्वभावअनुसार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वभावअनुसार__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छिनछिन; छिनछिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छिनछिन__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहिले-पहिले; पहिले-पहिले; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहिले-पहिले__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पहिले-पहिले; पहिले-पहिले; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पहिले-पहिले__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हुनुपूर्व; हुनुपूर्व; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हुनुपूर्व__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बलात्; बलात्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बलात्__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खूब-खूब; खूब-खूब; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खूब-खूब__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चिर्बिर; चिर्बिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चिर्बिर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रमरमती; रमरमती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रमरमती__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खुब; खुब; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खुब__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भताभुङ्ग; भताभुङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भताभुङ्ग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यसैताक; त्यसैताक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यसैताक__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अतिव्यस्त; अतिव्यस्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अतिव्यस्त__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खुरुक्क; खुरुक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खुरुक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ढलिमलि; ढलिमलि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ढलिमलि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कथम्कदाचित; कथम्कदाचित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कथम्कदाचित__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सामान्यतया; सामान्यतया; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सामान्यतया__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ढपक्क; ढपक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ढपक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मारी; मारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मारी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- होशियारपूर्वक; होशियारपूर्वक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="होशियारपूर्वक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वेद-वेदान्तभन्दा; वेद-वेदान्तभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वेद-वेदान्तभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="स्ष्टतः"><i>स्ष्टतः</i><par n="स्ष्टतः__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="किनारैकिनार"><i>किनारैकिनार</i><par n="किनारैकिनार__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्यत्रै"><i>अन्यत्रै</i><par n="अन्यत्रै__"/></e>
    <e lm="झल्झली"><i>झल्झली</i><par n="झल्झली__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="माथिल्लो"><i>माथिल्लो</i><par n="माथिल्लो__"/></e>
    <e lm="जिरीङ्ग"><i>जिरीङ्ग</i><par n="जिरीङ्ग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जबकी"><i>जबकी</i><par n="जबकी__"/></e>
    <e lm="छउञ्जेल"><i>छउञ्जेल</i><par n="छउञ्जेल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सर्रसर्र"><i>सर्रसर्र</i><par n="सर्रसर्र__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अधिराज्यभर"><i>अधिराज्यभर</i><par n="अधिराज्यभर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तत्र"><i>तत्र</i><par n="तत्र__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तत्र"><i>तत्र</i><par n="तत्र__"/></e>
    <e lm="रञ्जनाभन्दा"><i>रञ्जनाभन्दा</i><par n="रञ्जनाभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बताउनुभन्दा"><i>बताउनुभन्दा</i><par n="बताउनुभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ठीक्क"><i>ठीक्क</i><par n="ठीक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="साँच्ची"><i>साँच्ची</i><par n="साँच्ची__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="केहिबेर"><i>केहिबेर</i><par n="केहिबेर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फाट्टफुट्ट"><i>फाट्टफुट्ट</i><par n="फाट्टफुट्ट__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मगमग"><i>मगमग</i><par n="मगमग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नहुन्जेल"><i>नहुन्जेल</i><par n="नहुन्जेल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="शान्तिपूर्वक"><i>शान्तिपूर्वक</i><par n="शान्तिपूर्वक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रदूषणभन्दा"><i>प्रदूषणभन्दा</i><par n="प्रदूषणभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वभावअनुसार"><i>स्वभावअनुसार</i><par n="स्वभावअनुसार__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="छिनछिन"><i>छिनछिन</i><par n="छिनछिन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिले-पहिले"><i>पहिले-पहिले</i><par n="पहिले-पहिले__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिले-पहिले"><i>पहिले-पहिले</i><par n="पहिले-पहिले__"/></e>
    <e lm="हुनुपूर्व"><i>हुनुपूर्व</i><par n="हुनुपूर्व__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बलात्"><i>बलात्</i><par n="बलात्__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="खूब-खूब"><i>खूब-खूब</i><par n="खूब-खूब__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="चिर्बिर"><i>चिर्बिर</i><par n="चिर्बिर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="रमरमती"><i>रमरमती</i><par n="रमरमती__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="खुब"><i>खुब</i><par n="खुब__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भताभुङ्ग"><i>भताभुङ्ग</i><par n="भताभुङ्ग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यसैताक"><i>त्यसैताक</i><par n="त्यसैताक__"/></e>
    <e lm="अतिव्यस्त"><i>अतिव्यस्त</i><par n="अतिव्यस्त__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="खुरुक्क"><i>खुरुक्क</i><par n="खुरुक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ढलिमलि"><i>ढलिमलि</i><par n="ढलिमलि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कथम्कदाचित"><i>कथम्कदाचित</i><par n="कथम्कदाचित__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सामान्यतया"><i>सामान्यतया</i><par n="सामान्यतया__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ढपक्क"><i>ढपक्क</i><par n="ढपक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मारी"><i>मारी</i><par n="मारी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="होशियारपूर्वक"><i>होशियारपूर्वक</i><par n="होशियारपूर्वक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वेद-वेदान्तभन्दा"><i>वेद-वेदान्तभन्दा</i><par n="वेद-वेदान्तभन्दा__adv"/></e>
